District of Columbia statutes.
47-351.02

Powers of the Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor or the Mayor’s designated officer shall invest, deposit, or obtain financial services for all District funds that the Mayor does not need for immediate disbursement.

(b)

The Mayor may exercise any power that is necessary to implement and enforce this subchapter.

(c)

During a control year, as defined in § 47-393(4), the powers exercised by the Mayor pursuant to this subchapter, except for § 47-351.16, shall be exercised by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia (“CFO”).

History

Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(c), 44 DCR 6933

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-351.01, § 47-351.03, § 47-351.04, § 47-351.05, § 47-351.06, § 47-351.07, § 47-351.08, § 47-351.09, § 47-351.10, § 47-351.11, § 47-351.12, and § 47-351.13.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-351.2.

Emergency Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-351.01.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under Law 5-50, see Mayor’s Order 84-82, May 4,1984.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 9-185, “Public Funds Investment Policy in Financial Institutions and Companies Making Loans to or Doing Business with Northern Ireland Amendment Act of 1992”, see Mayor’s Order 93-76, June 16, 1993.

Mayor's Orders

Companies and their subsidiaries or affiliates doing business in or with the Republic of South Africa or Namibia: See Mayor’s Order 90-115, August 14, 1990 and Mayor’s Order 90-189, November 30, 1990.